Utah statutes.
77-33-10.   Citation -- Uniform Rendition of Prisoners as Witnesses in Criminal Proceedings Act.

This act may be cited as the "Uniform Rendition of Prisoners as Witnesses in Criminal Proceedings Act."



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

